src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-unimorphstuff_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    andõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: āndaksmõ
    andõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: āndakstõ
    andõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: āndakstõ
    andõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: ānda
    andõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ānda
    andõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: āndagid
    andõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: āndagid
    andõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: āndag
    andõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: āndag
    andõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: āndagõd
    andõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: āndagõd
    andõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: āndaji
    andõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: āndajid
    andõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: āndajid
    andõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: andõn
    andõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: andõnd
    andõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: andtõd
    andõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: andtõb
    āndõļtõ+V+Inf: āndõļtõ
    āndõļtõ+V+Ger: āndõļtõs
    āndõļtõ+V+Sup: āndõļtõm
    āndõļtõ+V+Sup+Ela: āndõļtõmõst
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: āndõļtõb
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: āndõļtõd
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: āndõļtõb
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: āndõļtõm
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: āndõļtõt
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: āndõļtõbõd
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: āndõļtiz
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: āndõļtizt
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: āndõļtiz
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: āndõļtizmõ
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [āndõļtizt, āndõļtiztõ]
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [āndõļtizt, āndõļtiztõ]
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: āndõļt
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: āndõļtõm
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: āndõļtõt
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: āndõļtõt
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: āndõļtõks
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: āndõļtõkst
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: āndõļtõks
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: āndõļtõksmõ
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: āndõļtõkstõ
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: āndõļtõkstõ
    āndõļtõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: āndõļtõks
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: āndõļtõksmõ
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: āndõļtõkstõ
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: āndõļtõkstõ
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: āndõļt
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: āndõļt
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: āndõļtõgid
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: āndõļtõgid
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: āndõļtõg
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: āndõļtõg
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: āndõļtõgõd
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: āndõļtõgõd
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: āndõļtiji
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: āndõļtijid
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: āndõļtijid
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: āndõļtõn
    āndõļtõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: āndõļtõnd
    āndõļtõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: āndõļtõd
    āndõļtõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: āndõļtõb
    apāndõ+V+Inf: apāndõ
    apāndõ+V+Ger: apāndõs
    apāndõ+V+Sup: apāndõm
    apāndõ+V+Sup+Ela: apāndõmõst
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: apāndõb
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: apāndõd
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: apāndõb
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: apāndõm
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: apāndõt
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: apāndõbõd
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: apāndiz
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: apāndizt
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: apāndiz
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: apāndizmõ
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [apāndizt, apāndiztõ]
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [apāndizt, apāndiztõ]
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: apānd
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: apāndõm
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: apāndõt
    apāndõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: apāndõt
    apāndõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: apāndõks
    apāndõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: apāndõkst
    apāndõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: apāndõks
    apāndõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: apāndõksmõ
    apāndõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: apāndõkstõ
    apāndõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: apāndõkstõ
    apāndõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: apāndõks
    apāndõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: apāndõksmõ
    apāndõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: apāndõkstõ
    apāndõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: apāndõkstõ
    apāndõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: apānd
    apāndõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: apānd
    apāndõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: apāndõgid
    apāndõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: apāndõgid
    apāndõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: apāndõg
    apāndõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: apāndõg
    apāndõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: apāndõgõd
    apāndõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: apāndõgõd
    apāndõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: apāndiji
    apāndõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: apāndijid
    apāndõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: apāndijid
    apāndõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: apāndõn
    apāndõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: apāndõnd
    apāndõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: apāndtõd
    apāndõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: apāndtõb
    apāntõ+V+Inf: apāntõ
    apāntõ+V+Ger: apāntõs
    apāntõ+V+Sup: apāntõm
    apāntõ+V+Sup+Ela: apāntõmõst
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: apāntõb
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: apāntõd
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: apāntõb
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: apāntõm
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: apāntõt
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: apāntõbõd
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: apāntiz
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: apāntizt
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: apāntiz
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: apāntizmõ
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [apāntizt, apāntiztõ]
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [apāntizt, apāntiztõ]
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: apānt
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: apāntõm
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: apāntõt
    apāntõ+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: apāntõt
    apāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: apāntõks
    apāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: apāntõkst
    apāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: apāntõks
    apāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: apāntõksmõ
    apāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: apāntõkstõ
    apāntõ+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: apāntõkstõ
    apāntõ+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg: apāntõks
    apāntõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: apāntõksmõ
    apāntõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: apāntõkstõ
    apāntõ+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: apāntõkstõ
    apāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: apānt
    apāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: apānt
    apāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: apāntõgid
    apāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: apāntõgid
    apāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Sg: apāntõg
    apāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg: apāntõg
    apāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+Pl: apāntõgõd
    apāntõ+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl: apāntõgõd
    apāntõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Sg: apāntiji
    apāntõ+V+Act+Quo+Pl: apāntijid
    apāntõ+V+Act+Quo+ConNeg+Pl: apāntijid
    apāntõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: apāntõn
    apāntõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: apāntõnd
    apāntõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: apāntõd
    apāntõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: apāntõb
